Utah statutes.
62A-4a-311.   Child Abuse Advisory Council -- Creation -- Membership --
Expenses.
(1) (a)  There is established the Child Abuse Advisory Council composed of no
more than 25 members who are appointed by the division.
(b)  Except as required by Subsection (1)(c), as terms of current council
members expire, the division shall appoint each new member or reappointed
member to a four-year term.
(c)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (1)(b), the division
shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms
to ensure that the terms of council members are staggered so that
approximately half of the council is appointed every two years.
(d)  The council shall have geographic, economic, gender, cultural, and
philosophical diversity.
(e)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term.
(2)  The council shall elect a chairperson from its membership at least
biannually.
(3)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(4)  The council shall hold a public meeting quarterly.  Within budgetary
constraints, meetings may also be held on the call of the chair, or of a
majority of the members.  A majority of the members currently appointed to the
council constitute a quorum at any meeting and the action of the majority of
the members present shall be the action of the council.
(5)  The council shall:
(a)  advise the division on matters relating to abuse and neglect; and
(b)  recommend to the division how funds contained in the Children's Account
should be allocated.
